Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated  to the Water Resources Department, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts,  for the
following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............  $ 11,791,180
(2) Field services ............................  $ 21,709,810
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 5,097,469
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 15,675,839
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 12,871,815
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$15,073,140 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Water Resources Department for debt service.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and in-
cluding federal funds received under cooperative agreements with or contracts  from the
Bureau of Reclamation of the United States Department of the Interior, the United States
Army Corps of Engineers, the United States Geological Survey,  the Bonneville Power Ad-
ministration and the National Fish and Wildlife Foundation,  but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in  this section, collected or received by the Water Resources
Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 2,139,346
(2) Field services ............................ $ 2,961,408
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 4,286,335
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 3,559,895
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 77,568,389
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 1
of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 3 of this 2023 Act, col-
lected or received by the Water Resources Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative services ............ $ 25,000
(2) Field services ............................ $ 75,000
(3) Water rights and
adjudications............................. $ 25,000
(4) Technical services ..................... $ 553,315
(5) Director’s office ........................ $ 25,000
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses by the Water Resources Department from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Water Resources  Department, for the following
purposes:
(1) Grant to Umatilla County
for the Ordnance Regional
Water Infrastructure Project ... $ 6,000,000
(2) Place-based planning
activities ................................... $ 800,000
(3) Assistance to local
governments with meeting
fish passage requirements
for dam upgrade projects .......... $ 500,000
(4) Support for the water
measurement cost-share
program .................................... $ 1,000,000
(5) Supplement fee-based services
pending development of
sustainable, long-term
funding mechanisms ................. $ 1,500,000
(6) Provision of contracted
services to perform flood
methodology and inundation
assessments for dams and
engineering analyses on dams .. $ 2,500,000
(7) Purchase and deployment of
surface and ground water
data collection equipment ......... $ 2,600,000
SECTION 6.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,000,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Water Resources Department  from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Water Resources Department and deposited  in
the Water Well Abandonment, Repair and Replacement Fund established in ORS  537.766, for
the purpose of carrying out the program purposes described in ORS 537.767.
SECTION 7. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 2
Passed by House June 13, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5043 (HB 5043-A) Page 3